Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.180

Disobedience of order punishable as contempt.

A person who refuses, or without sufficient excuse neglects, to obey an order of a judge or referee made pursuant to any of the provisions of this chapter, and duly served upon him or her, or an oral direction given directly to him or her by a judge or referee in the course of the special proceeding, or to attend before a judge or referee according to the command of a subpoena duly served upon him or her, may be punished by the judge of the court out of which the execution issued, as for contempt.

[ 2011 c 336 s 160; 1893 c 133 s 18; RRS s 630.]